sv: Hem och trädgård > Kök och matsal > Verktyg för matlagning och bakning > Matlagningstillbehör: Värmediffusorer; Kastrull- och stekpannehandtag; Kastrull- och stekpannelock; Tillbehör till tryckkokare; Stänkskärmar; Insatser för ångkokning; Woktillbehör
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 厨房/餐厅 > 炊具/烘焙用具 > 炊具配件: 导热盘; 锅柄; 壶/锅盖; 高压锅配件; 防溅网; 蒸篮; 炒锅配件
en: Home & Garden > Kitchen & Dining > Cookware & Bakeware > Cookware Accessories: Heat Diffusers; Pot & Pan Handles; Pot & Pan Lids; Pressure Cooker & Canner Accessories; Splatter Screens; Steamer Baskets; Wok Accessories
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Bucătărie și sufragerie > Articole pentru gătit și copt > Accesorii pentru gătit: Difuzoare de căldură pentru aragaz; Mânere pentru oale și tigăi; Capace pentru oale și tigăi; Accesorii pentru oale sub presiune și oale pentru conserve; Ecrane antistropire; Coșuri pentru prepararea alimentelor la aburi; Accesorii pentru tigăi wok
nl: Huis en tuin > Keuken en eetkamer > Kookgerei en bakvormen > Kookaccessoires: Warmteverdelers; Handvaten voor pannen; Pannendeksels; Accessoires voor snelkookpannen en weckketels; Spatschermen; Stoommandjes; Wokaccessoires
da: Hjem og have > Køkken og spisestue > Kogegrej og bageforme > Kogegrej – tilbehør: Varmefordelere; Potter og pander – håndtag; Potter og pander – låg; Trykkoger og trykhenkogning – tilbehør; Stænkskærme; Kurve til dampkoger; Wok – tilbehør
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 주방/식탁 > 조리/제빵 도구 > 취사도구 부대용품: 열 확산판; 냄비/팬 손잡이; 냄비/팬 뚜껑; 압력솥/용기 부대용품; 기름 튐 방지망; 찜 삼발이; 웍 부대용품
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 廚房與餐廳 > 調理烘焙鍋具 > 廚房用具: 導熱板; 鍋具把手; 鍋蓋; 壓力鍋配件; 防噴油網; 蒸籠; 炒鍋配件
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Kuhinja in jedilnica > Posode za kuhanje in peko > Dodatki za posode za kuhanje: Razpršilniki toplote; Ročaji za lonce in ponve; Pokrovi za lonce in ponve; Dodatki za ekonom lonce in aparate za konzerviranje; Zaščite za brizganje; Košare za kuhanje na pari; Dodatki za voke
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Mutfak ve Yemek > Ocak ve Fırında Pişirme Gereçleri > Pişirme Gereçleri: Isı Dağıtıcılar; Tencere ve Tava Sapları; Tencere ve Tava Kapakları; Düdüklü Tencere Aksesuarları; Sıçrama Önleyici Paneller; Buharlı Pişirme Sepetleri; Wok Tava Aksesuarları
pl: Dom i ogród > Kuchnia i jadalnia > Garnki i formy do pieczenia > Akcesoria do garnków: Dyfuzory ciepła; Uchwyty do garnków i patelni; Pokrywki do garnków i patelni; Akcesoria do szybkowarów i urządzeń do konserwowania pod ciśnieniem; Osłony przeciwbryzgowe; Koszyki do parowarów; Akcesoria do woków
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Kuhinja i blagovaonica > Posuđe za kuhanje i pečenje > Dodaci za posuđe za kuhanje: Difuzori topline; Drške za lonce i tave; Poklopci za lonce i tave; Dodaci za ekspres lonce i lonce za kuhanje pod tlakom; Zaštite od prskanja; Košare za kuhanje na pari; Dodaci za wok
cs: Dům a zahrada > Kuchyně a jídelny > Nádobí na vaření a pečení > Kuchyňské nádobí – příslušenství: Tepelné difuzéry; Úchyty pro hrnce; Pokličky na hrnce a pánve; Tlakové a zavařovací hrnce – příslušenství; Stříkací síťky na pánve; Napařovače; Pánve wok – příslušenství
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > キッチン・ダイニング > 調理器具 > 鍋・フライパン関連用品: ヒートディフューザー; なべ・フライパン用取っ手; なべ・フライパン用フタ; 圧力鍋関連用品; スプラッタースクリーン; せいろ; 中華鍋関連用品
it: Casa e giardino > Cucina e pranzo > Pentolame e tegami da forno > Accessori cucina: Diffusori di calore; Manopole tegami e pentole; Coperchi tegami e pentole; Accessori per pentole a pressione; Schermi antispruzzo; Cestelli cottura a vapore; Accessori wok
fr: Maison et jardin > Arts de la table et arts culinaires > Matériel de cuisson et de pâtisserie > Accessoires pour cuisson: Diffuseurs de chaleur; Poignées pour batterie de cuisine; Couvercles pour batterie de cuisine; Accessoires pour autocuiseurs; Écrans anti-éclaboussures; Paniers à vapeur; Accessoires pour woks
vi: Nhà và vườn > Phòng bếp và phòng ăn > Dụng cụ nấu và nướng > Dụng cụ nấu nướng: Tấm Tản Nhiệt; Quai nồi và chảo; Vung nồi; Phụ kiện nồi áp suất; Vung chắn dầu mỡ; Xửng hấp; Phụ kiện của xoong
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Produtos de cozinha e aparelhos de jantar > Panelas e assadeiras > Acessórios para conjunto de panelas: Difusores de calor; Cabos para panelas; Tampas para panelas; Acessórios para panela de pressão e conservas; Protetores contra respingos; Cestas para cozimento a vapor; Acessórios para wok
hu: Otthon és kert > Konyha és étkező > Főzőedények és sütőedények > Főzőedény-kiegészítők: Hőelosztók; Fazék- és serpenyőfogantyúk; Fazék- és serpenyőfedelek; Gyorsfőző- és befőzőkiegészítők; Fröccsenésvédők; Gőzölőkosarak; Wok-kiegészítők
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Keittiö ja ruokailu > Ruuanlaitto- ja leivontatarvikkeet > Ruuanlaittovälineet: Lämmönlevittimet; Kattiloiden ja pannujen kahvat; Kattiloiden ja pannujen kannet; Painekeittimen lisätarvikkeet; Roiskesuojat; Höyrytyskorit; Wokkitarvikkeet
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Кухня и трапезария > Съдове за готвене и печене > Аксесоари за готварски съдове: Дифузери за топлина; Дръжки за тенджери и тигани; Капаци за тенджери и тигани; Аксесоари за тенджера под налягане и консерви; Предпазни мрежи; Кошници за готвене на пара; Аксесоари за уок тигани
th: บ้านและสวน > ห้องครัวและการรับประทานอาหาร > อุปกรณ์ทำอาหารและอุปกรณ์อบอาหาร > อุปกรณ์ทำอาหาร: เครื่องกระจายความร้อน; ที่จับของหม้อและกระทะ; ที่ปิดหม้อและกระทะ; อุปกรณ์หม้อความดันและแคนเนอร์; ฝาปิดกันกระเด็น; ซึ้งนึ่ง; อุปกรณ์กระทะ
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Cozinha e refeições > Utensílios para cozinhar e fazer bolos > Acessórios de utensílios para cozinhar: Difusores de calor; Pegas para tachos e panelas; Tampas para tachos e panelas; Acessórios para panelas de pressão e enlatadores de pressão; Telas contra respingos; Cestos para cozinhar a vapor; Acessórios para wok
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Virtuvė ir valgomasis > Kaitlentės ir orkaitės indai > Kaitlentės indų priedai: Karščio difuzoriai; Puodų ir keptuvių rankenos; Puodų ir keptuvių dangčiai; Greitpuodžių ir konservų sterilizavimo puodų priedai; Apsauginis dangtis nuo taškymosi; Troškinimo garuose krepšeliai; Vokų priedai
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Κουζίνα & τραπεζαρία > Σκεύη μαγειρικής & ζαχαροπλαστικής > Αξεσουάρ σκευών μαγειρικής: Διαχύτες θερμότητας; Λαβές κατσαρολών & τηγανιών; Καπάκια κατσαρολών & τηγανιών; Αξεσουάρ χυτρών & δοχείων κονσερβοποίησης; Σίτες προστασίας από πιτσιλίσματα; Καλάθια ατμού; Αξεσουάρ γουόκ
es: Casa y jardín > Cocina y comedor > Utensilios para cocinar y para hornear > Accesorios para cocinar: Difusores de calor; Mangos para sartenes y ollas; Tapaderas para sartenes y ollas; Accesorios para ollas a presión; Mallas antisalpicaduras; Cestos para cocer al vapor; Accesorios para woks
ru: Дом и сад > Кухня и сервировка стола > Кухонная и жаропрочная посуда > Аксессуары для кухонной посуды: Рассекатели; Ручки для кастрюль и сковород; Крышки для кастрюль и сковород; Аксессуары для скороварок и автоклавов; Защитные экраны от брызг; Вставки для приготовления на пару; Аксессуары для воков
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Kuchyňa a jedáleň > Nádoby na varenie a pečenie > Príslušenstvo k hrncom: Tepelné difuzéry; Rúčky na hrnce a panvice; Pokrievky na hrnce a panvice; Príslušenstvo pre tlakové a zaváracie hrnce; Ochranné plachty proti postriekaniu; Parné koše; Príslušenstvo pre wok
de: Heim & Garten > Küche & Esszimmer > Kochgeschirr & Backformen > Kochgeschirrzubehör: Wärmediffusoren; Topf- & Pfannengriffe; Topf- & Pfannendeckel; Schnellkochtopfzubehör; Spritzschutzwände; Dampfkörbe; Wokzubehör
nb: Hjem og hage > Kjøkken og spiserom > Matlagnings- og bakeutstyr > Tilbehør til matlagning: Varmespredere; Håndtak til gryter og panner; Lokk til gryter og panner; Tilbehør til trykkokere og -bokser; Sprutskjermer; Dampkurver; Woktilbehør